Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Merger.

Sec. 10.55.201.
Merger authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

, by complying with AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

,

one or more domestic entities may merge with one or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

two or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic entity.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

or may be the surviving entity in a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

The provisions of AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

do not apply to

a merger or consolidation under

AS

10.06.530

—

10.06.562

or

10.06.960

(Alaska Corporations Code); or

AS

10.50.500

—

10.50.565

(Alaska Revised Limited Liability Company Act); or

a merger under

AS

10.20.216

—

10.20.280

(Alaska Nonprofit Corporation Act); or

AS

32.06.905

—

32.06.907

(Uniform Partnership Act).

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.202.
Plan of merger.

A domestic entity may become a party to a merger under AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

by approving a plan of merger. The plan must be in a record and contain

as to each merging entity, the merging entity’s name, jurisdiction of organization, and type;

if the surviving entity is to be created in the merger, a statement to that effect and the surviving entity’s name, jurisdiction of organization, and type;

the manner of converting the interests in each party to the merger into interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property;

if the surviving entity exists before the merger, any proposed amendments to the surviving entity’s public organic document or private organic rules that are, or are proposed to be, in a record;

if the surviving entity is to be created in the merger, the surviving entity’s proposed public organic document, if any, and the full text of the surviving entity’s private organic rules that are proposed to be in a record;

the other terms and conditions of the merger; and

any other provision required by the law of a merging entity’s jurisdiction of organization or the organic rules of a merging entity.

A plan of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.203.
Approval of merger.

A plan of merger is not effective unless it has been approved

by a domestic merging entity

in accordance with the requirements, if any, in the merging entity’s organic law and organic rules for approval of,

in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger; or

in the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation; or

if neither the merging entity’s organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of a merger described in (A)(ii) of this paragraph, by all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

in a record, by each interest holder of a domestic merging entity that will have interest-holder liability for liabilities that arise after the merger becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation,

the organic rules of the entity provide in a record for the approval of a merger in which some or all of the entity’s interest holders become subject to interest-holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all of the interest holders; and

the interest holder voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

A merger involving a foreign merging entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.204.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of merger.

A plan of merger of a domestic merging entity may be amended

in the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

by the governors or interest holders of the entity in the manner provided in the plan; however, an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the merger is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change

the amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, to be received by the interest holders of any party to the plan;

the public organic document or private organic rules of the surviving entity that will be in effect immediately after the merger becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the surviving entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the interest holder in any material respect.

After a plan of merger has been approved by a domestic merging entity and before a statement of merger becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned

as provided in the plan; or

unless prohibited by the plan, in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of merger is abandoned after a statement of merger has been filed with the department and before the filing becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed on behalf of a merging entity, must be filed with the department before the time the statement of merger becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the merger is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain

the name of each merging or surviving entity that is a domestic entity or a qualified foreign entity;

the date on which the statement of merger was filed; and

a statement that the merger has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.205.
Statement of merger; effective date.

A statement of merger shall be signed on behalf of each merging entity and filed with the department.

A statement of merger must contain

the name, jurisdiction of organization, and type of each merging entity that is not the surviving entity;

the name, jurisdiction of organization, and type of the surviving entity;

if the statement of merger is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing;

a statement that the merger was approved by each domestic merging entity, if any, in accordance with AS

10.55.201

—

10.55.206

and by each foreign merging entity, if any, in accordance with the law of the foreign merging entity’s jurisdiction of organization;

if the surviving entity exists before the merger and is a domestic filing entity, any amendment to the surviving entity’s public organic document approved as part of the plan of merger;

if the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic filing entity, the surviving entity’s public organic document, as an attachment;

if the surviving entity is created by the merger and is a domestic limited liability partnership, the surviving entity’s statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

if the surviving entity is a foreign entity that is not a qualified foreign entity, a mailing address to which the department may send any process served on the commissioner under AS

10.55.206

(e).

In addition to the requirements of (b) of this section, a statement of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the surviving entity is a domestic entity, the surviving entity’s public organic document, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that it does not need to be signed and may omit any provision that is not required to be included in a restatement of the public organic document.

A plan of merger that is signed on behalf of all of the merging entities and meets all of the requirements of (b) of this section may be filed with the department instead of a statement of merger and, on filing, has the same effect as a statement of merger. If a plan of merger is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this chapter to a statement of merger refer to the plan of merger filed under this subsection.

A statement of merger becomes effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of merger under (b)(3) of this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.206.
Effect of merger.

When a merger becomes effective,

the surviving entity continues or comes into existence;

each merging entity that is not the surviving entity ceases to exist;

all property of each merging entity vests in the surviving entity without assignment, reversion, or impairment;

all liabilities of each merging entity are liabilities of the surviving entity;

except as otherwise provided by law other than this chapter or the plan of merger, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each merging entity vest in the surviving entity;

if the surviving entity exists before the merger,

all of the surviving entity’s property continues to be vested in it without reversion or impairment;

the surviving entity remains subject to all of its liabilities; and

all of the surviving entity’s rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes continue to be vested in it;

the name of the surviving entity may be substituted for the name of any merging entity that is a party to any pending action or proceeding;

if the surviving entity exists before the merger,

the surviving entity’s public organic document, if any, is amended as provided in the statement of merger and is binding on its interest holders; and

the surviving entity’s private organic rules that are to be in a record, if any, are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger and are binding on and enforceable by

the surviving entity’s interest holders; and

in the case of a surviving entity that is not a business corporation or a nonprofit corporation, any other person that is a party to an agreement that is part of the surviving entity’s private organic rules;

if the surviving entity is created by the merger,

and if the surviving entity is a domestic entity, the surviving entity is subject to the organic law in this state that governs the internal affairs of the type of entity of the surviving entity;

the surviving entity’s public organic document, if any, is effective and is binding on its interest holders; and

the surviving entity’s private organic rules are effective and are binding on and enforceable by

the surviving entity’s interest holders; and

in the case of a surviving entity that is not a business corporation or a nonprofit corporation, any other person that was a party to an agreement that was part of the organic rules of a merging entity if that person has agreed to be a party to an agreement that is part of the surviving entity’s private organic rules; and

the interests in each merging entity that are to be converted in the merger are converted, and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of merger and to any dissenters’ rights they have under AS

10.55.109

and the merging entity’s organic law.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a merging entity, the merger does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would otherwise have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the merging entity.

When a merger becomes effective, a person that did not have interest-holder liability with respect to any of the merging entities and that becomes subject to interest-holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of a merger has interest-holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those liabilities that arise after the merger becomes effective.

When a merger becomes effective, the interest-holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic merging entity with respect to which the person had interest-holder liability is as follows:

the merger does not discharge any interest-holder liability under the organic law of the domestic merging entity to the extent the interest-holder liability arose before the merger became effective;

the person does not have interest-holder liability under the organic law of the domestic merging entity for any liability that arises after the merger becomes effective;

the organic law of the domestic merging entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the merger had not occurred and the surviving entity were the domestic merging entity; and

the person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by the organic law or organic rules of the domestic merging entity with respect to any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the merger had not occurred.

When a merger becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the surviving entity

may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any liabilities of a domestic merging entity; and

appoints the commissioner as the foreign entity’s agent for service of process for collecting or enforcing those liabilities.

When a merger becomes effective, the certificate of authority or other foreign qualification of any foreign merging entity that is not the surviving entity is cancelled.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)